Mississippi, session 2026, HB4144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Tony Qualls of Humphreys County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Burglary-Vehicle on February 2, 2004, in Washington County, for which he was sentenced to serve three (3) years in the Intensive Supervision Program/House Arrest under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  On July 6, 2007, he was convicted for the crime of Burglary-Nonresidential and on August 17, 2007, he was convicted of Burglary-Vehicle for which he was sentenced to serve four (4) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, with both sentences running concurrently.  He was paroled on November 11, 2008, and his sentence expired April 16, 2013.  He was convicted for the crime of Burglary-Nonresident on April 22, 2013, for which he was sentenced to serve three (3) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, and one (1) year supervised probation. He was paroled on April 22, 2014, and discharged on March 28, 2015.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.